Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-365
Net worth of a stock association, defined.

Net worth of a stock association shall mean the aggregate of the capital stock account, paid-in surplus, earned surplus, legal and federal insurance reserves, and undivided profits.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 10.